North Dakota, session 69, SB2003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the state
board of higher education and to the entities and institutions under the supervision of the board for the
purpose of defraying the expenses of the state board of higher education and the entities and
institutions under the supervision of the board, for the period beginning with the effective date of this
Act, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Subdivision 1.
NORTH DAKOTA UNIVERSITY SYSTEM
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Capital assets - bond payments $11,197,896 ($936,521) $10,261,375
Competitive research programs 5,685,750 0 5,685,750
System governance 10,569,162 1,181,064 11,750,226
State employee child care benefits 0 910,000 910,000

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 2
Core technology services 71,988,917 6,518,417 78,507,334
Student financial assistance grants 29,917,306 1,000,000 30,917,306
Supplemental student financial 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
assistance grants
Professional student exchange program 3,699,342 1,500,000 5,199,342
Academic and CTE scholarships 17,216,749 0 17,216,749
Scholars program 1,807,115 0 1,807,115
Native American scholarship 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Tribally controlled community 1,400,000 200,000 1,600,000
college grants
Education incentive programs 260,000 0 260,000
Student mental health 284,400 0 284,400
Veterans' assistance grants 454,875 0 454,875
Shared campus services 800,000 0 800,000
Nursing education consortium 1,356,000 1,100,000 2,456,000
NASA EPSCoR 342,000 0 342,000
Education challenge fund 0 24,760,000 24,760,000
Workforce education innovation grants 0 10,000,000 10,000,000
Dual-credit tuition scholarship 1,500,000 0 1,500,000
Total all funds $159,479,512 $51,232,960 $210,712,472
Less other funds 26,260,897 36,885,852 63,146,749
Total general fund $133,218,615 $14,347,108 $147,565,723
Full-time equivalent positions 162.83 6.00 168.83
Subdivision 2.
BISMARCK STATE COLLEGE
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $110,026,302 $5,165,031 $115,191,333
Capital assets 1,922,561 2,200,000 4,122,561
Total all funds $111,948,863 $7,365,031 $119,313,894
Less other funds 74,566,953 5,251,570 79,818,523
Total general fund $37,381,910 $2,113,461 $39,495,371
Full-time equivalent positions 335.33 2.92 338.25
Subdivision 3.
LAKE REGION STATE COLLEGE
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $41,913,733 $2,418,065 $44,331,798
Capital assets 362,667 2,500,000 2,862,667
Total all funds $42,276,400 $4,918,065 $47,194,465
Less other funds 26,601,597 3,431,171 30,032,768
Total general fund $15,674,803 $1,486,894 $17,161,697
Full-time equivalent positions 120.59 (5.44) 115.15
Subdivision 4.
WILLISTON STATE COLLEGE
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $37,378,349 $2,423,802 $39,802,151
Capital assets 1,261,968 0 1,261,968

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 3
Total all funds $38,640,317 $2,423,802 $41,064,119
Less other funds 25,154,992 796,812 25,951,804
Total general fund $13,485,325 $1,626,990 $15,112,315
Full-time equivalent positions 102.83 (3.09) 99.74
Subdivision 5.
UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $967,725,670 $56,041,426 $1,023,767,096
Capital assets 4,411,566 124,500,000 128,911,566
Research network 2,500,000 0 2,500,000
Total all funds $974,637,236 $180,541,426 $1,155,178,662
Less other funds 790,481,856 169,626,346 960,108,202
Total general fund $184,155,380 $10,915,080 $195,070,460
Full-time equivalent positions 2,060.56 131.39 2,191.95
Subdivision 6.
UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA SCHOOL OF MEDICINE AND HEALTH SCIENCES
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $240,396,968 $18,815,356 $259,212,324
Healthcare workforce initiative 10,676,150 0 10,676,150
Total all funds $251,073,118 $18,815,356 $269,888,474
Less other funds 168,241,842 5,776,474 174,018,316
Total general fund $82,831,276 $13,038,882 $95,870,158
Full-time equivalent positions 488.83 40.23 529.06
Subdivision 7.
NORTH DAKOTA STATE UNIVERSITY
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $807,365,091 $45,414,240 $852,779,331
Capital assets 7,799,104 125,000,000 132,799,104
Research network 2,500,000 0 2,500,000
Total all funds $817,664,195 $170,414,240 $988,078,435
Less other funds 653,917,430 163,772,791 817,690,221
Total general fund $163,746,765 $6,641,449 $170,388,214
Full-time equivalent positions 1,867.50 (61.54) 1,805.96
Subdivision 8.
NORTH DAKOTA STATE COLLEGE OF SCIENCE
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $102,490,255 $8,221,477 $110,711,732
Capital assets 1,012,379 65,000 1,077,379
Total all funds $103,502,634 $8,286,477 $111,789,111
Less other funds 63,645,097 2,338,578 65,983,675
Total general fund $39,857,537 $5,947,899 $45,805,436
Full-time equivalent positions 313.95 12.59 326.54

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 4
Subdivision 9.
DICKINSON STATE UNIVERSITY
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $56,728,746 $3,370,815 $60,099,561
Capital assets 409,078 12,500,000 12,909,078
Total all funds $57,137,824 $15,870,815 $73,008,639
Less other funds 32,697,829 13,758,716 46,456,545
Total general fund $24,439,995 $2,112,099 $26,552,094
Full-time equivalent positions 178.00 (7.20) 170.80
Subdivision 10.
MAYVILLE STATE UNIVERSITY
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $56,295,375 $2,799,716 $59,095,091
Capital assets 358,992 34,924,814 35,283,806
Total all funds $56,654,367 $37,724,530 $94,378,897
Less other funds 34,375,971 36,760,335 71,136,306
Total general fund $22,278,396 $964,195 $23,242,591
Full-time equivalent positions 226.92 0.00 226.92
Subdivision 11.
MINOT STATE UNIVERSITY
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $116,510,048 $4,701,181 $121,211,229
Capital assets 1,099,620 27,867,000 28,966,620
Total all funds $117,609,668 $32,568,181 $150,177,849
Less other funds 68,644,425 22,339,213 90,983,638
Total general fund $48,965,243 $10,228,968 $59,194,211
Full-time equivalent positions 423.63 (2.47) 421.16
Subdivision 12.
VALLEY CITY STATE UNIVERSITY
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $56,008,906 $1,499,518 $57,508,424
Capital assets 455,823 0 455,823
Total all funds $56,464,729 $1,499,518 $57,964,247
Less other funds 28,111,916 1,421,115 29,533,031
Total general fund $28,352,813 $78,403 $28,431,216
Full-time equivalent positions 211.94 5.50 217.44
Subdivision 13.
DAKOTA COLLEGE AT BOTTINEAU
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $26,229,141 $1,249,697 $27,478,838

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 5
Capital assets 114,007 500,000 614,007
Total all funds $26,343,148 $1,749,697 $28,092,845
Less other funds 14,900,270 555,764 15,456,034
Total general fund $11,442,878 $1,193,933 $12,636,811
Full-time equivalent positions 84.00 3.85 87.85
Subdivision 14.
NORTH DAKOTA FOREST SERVICE
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Operations $24,874,803 $1,942,413 $26,817,216
Capital assets 118,728 0 118,728
Total all funds $24,993,531 $1,942,413 $26,935,944
Less other funds 19,141,941 1,399,079 20,541,020
Total general fund $5,851,590 $543,334 $6,394,924
Full-time equivalent positions 29.00 7.00 36.00
Subdivision 15.
TOTAL - SECTION 1
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Grand total all funds $2,838,425,542 $535,352,511 $3,373,778,053
Grand total other funds 2,026,743,016 464,113,816 2,490,856,832
Grand total general fund $811,682,526 $71,238,695 $882,921,221
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO THE
SEVENTIETH LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items
included in the appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget
for the 2027-29 biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the
seventieth legislative assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One - Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total Funds
Capital projects - general fund $9,635,000 $0 $9,635,000
Capital projects - strategic investment 0 101,196,814 101,196,814
and improvements fund
Capital projects - other funds 0 219,225,000 219,225,000
Williston state college health care 1,490,000 0 1,490,000
program startup costs
University of North Dakota national 0 16,000,000 16,000,000
security crossroads
North Dakota state university new 0 16,000,000 16,000,000
horizon programming
State college of science lease payments 1,300,000 0 1,300,000
and aviation maintenance program
Mayville state university nursing simulation 500,000 0 500,000
laboratory
Minot state university advancing students 500,000 0 500,000
toward education and employment
Dual-credit scholarships 0 1,500,000 1,500,000
Challenge grants 0 24,760,000 24,760,000
Nursing education consortium 0 1,100,000 1,100,000
Financial aid system enhancements 25,000 0 25,000
Workforce education innovation grants 0 10,000,000 10,000,000

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 6
Forest service emerald ash borer mitigation 0 950,000 950,000
Total $13,450,000 $390,731,814 $404,181,814
SECTION 3. ADDITIONAL FEDERAL, PRIVATE, AND OTHER FUNDS - APPROPRIATION. All
funds, in addition to those appropriated in section 1 of this Act, from federal, private, and other sources
for competitive grants or other funds that the legislative assembly has not indicated the intent to reject,
including tuition revenue, received by the state board of higher education and the institutions and
entities under the control of the state board of higher education, are appropriated to the board and
those institutions and entities, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. All
additional funds received under the North Dakota-Minnesota reciprocity agreement during the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, are appropriated to the state board of higher
education for reimbursement to institutions under the control of the board.
SECTION 4. USE OF EXTRAORDINARY REPAIRS FUNDING - MATCHING FUNDS. The capital
assets line items in subdivisions 2 through 12 of section 1 of this Act include funding from the general
fund for institution extraordinary repairs. An institution, excluding the university of North Dakota and
North Dakota state university, shall provide one dollar of matching funds from operations or other
sources for each one dollar of extraordinary repairs funding used for a project. The university of North
Dakota and North Dakota state university shall provide two dollars of matching funds from operations or
other sources for each one dollar of extraordinary repairs funding used for a project.
SECTION 5. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
grand total other funds line item in subdivision 15 of section 1 of this Act includes $170,006,814 from
the strategic investment and improvements fund as follows:
Challenge grants $24,760,000
Nursing education consortium 1,100,000
Workforce education innovation grants 10,000,000
Forest service emerald ash borer mitigation 950,000
Lake Region state college roof project 2,500,000
University of North Dakota science, technology, engineering, and 55,640,000
mathematics building
University of North Dakota national security crossroads 16,000,000
North Dakota state university new horizon programming 16,000,000
Mayville state university old main renovation 34,924,814
Minot state university academic facilities projects 8,132,000
Total strategic investment and improvements fund $170,006,814
SECTION 6. OTHER FUNDS - COMMUNITY HEALTH TRUST FUND - UNIVERSITY OF NORTH
DAKOTA SCHOOL OF MEDICINE AND HEALTH SCIENCES - ALLIED HEALTH FACILITY. The other
funds line item in subdivision 5 of section 1 of this Act includes $5,000,000 from the community health
trust fund for the university of North Dakota school of medicine and health sciences allied health facility
project.
SECTION 7. TRANSFER - NORTH DAKOTA UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OFFICE - BISMARCK
STATE COLLEGE. Of the funding appropriated in the system governance and core technology services
line items in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act, the state board of higher education shall transfer
$500,000 to the operations line item in subdivision 2 of section 1 of this Act by August 1, 2025. The
North Dakota university system office may not assess institutions under the control of the state board of
higher education to recover the cost of this transfer.
SECTION 8. TRANSFER - NORTH DAKOTA UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OFFICE - LAKE REGION
STATE COLLEGE. Of the funding appropriated in the system governance and core technology services
line items in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act, the state board of higher education shall transfer
$342,000 to the operations line item in subdivision 3 of section 1 of this Act by August 1, 2025. The
North Dakota university system office may not assess institutions under the control of the state board of
higher education to recover the cost of this transfer.

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 7
SECTION 9. TRANSFER - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA PROFITS - STATE BOARD OF HIGHER
EDUCATION SCHOLARSHIPS. The industrial commission shall transfer to the North Dakota university
system office a total of $1,500,000 from the current earnings and accumulated undivided profits of the
Bank of North Dakota during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as
requested by the commissioner of higher education. The other funds line item in subdivision 1 of
section 1 includes $1,500,000 for the North Dakota university system office for dual-credit tuition
scholarships.
SECTION 10. TRANSFER - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM CAPITAL BUILDING FUND. The office of management and budget shall
transfer $26,500,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund to the university system
capital building fund during the period beginning with the effective date of this Act, and ending June 30,
2027, as requested by the commissioner of higher education. Funding transferred pursuant to this
section is to be allocated to each institution as follows:
Tier II Tier III Total
Bismarck state college $770,505 $700,000 $1,470,505
Lake Region state college 233,263 700,000 933,263
Williston state college 322,154 700,000 1,022,154
University of North Dakota 5,354,139 2,600,000 7,954,139
North Dakota state university 4,695,895 2,600,000 7,295,895
North Dakota state college of science 1,214,738 700,000 1,914,738
Dickinson state university 516,884 700,000 1,216,884
Mayville state university 332,070 700,000 1,032,070
Minot state university 906,412 700,000 1,606,412
Valley City state university 452,403 700,000 1,152,403
Dakota college at Bottineau 201,537 700,000 901,537
Total $15,000,000 $11,500,000 $26,500,000
SECTION 11. CAPITAL BUILDING FUNDS - USES. The institutions listed may use funding from
the respective institution's university system capital building fund allocation for the following projects
authorized by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly:
Bismarck state college - student housing $2,200,000
University of North Dakota - science, technology, engineering, and 79,500,000
mathematics building
University of North Dakota - allied health facility 45,000,000
Dickinson state university - Woods hall and agriculture and technical 12,500,000
education building projects
North Dakota state university - university village replacement phase II 54,000,000
North Dakota state university - Van Es biosafety laboratory 8,000,000
Minot state university - regional health sciences institute 13,000,000
Total $214,200,000
SECTION 12. CAMPUS CAPITAL PROJECTS - PROJECT MANAGEMENT. During the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, each capital project authorized by the state board of
higher education must have adequate project management oversight by either an institution official or a
representative of an external entity. An institution may seek assistance from the university system office
for project management oversight of a capital project.
SECTION 13. BOND ISSUANCE AUTHORIZATION - PURPOSES. The state board of higher
education, in accordance with chapter 15-55, may arrange for the funding of projects authorized in this
section, declared to be in the public interest, through the issuance of self-liquidating, tax-exempt
evidences of indebtedness under chapter 15-55, during the period beginning with the effective date of
this Act, and ending June 30, 2027. Evidences of indebtedness issued pursuant to this section are not a
general obligation of the state of North Dakota. Any unexpended balance resulting from the proceeds of
the evidences of indebtedness must be placed in a sinking fund to be used for the retirement of

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 8
indebtedness. The evidences of indebtedness may be issued and the proceeds are appropriated in
section 1 of this Act for the following capital projects:
North Dakota state university - university village replacement phase II $54,000,000
North Dakota state university - memorial union renovation and addition and 50,000,000
related demolition of other facilities
Dickinson state university - Woods hall, agriculture and technical education 12,500,000
building, and rodeo arena projects
Minot state university - student center 3,100,000
Total special funds $119,600,000
SECTION 14. NORTH DAKOTA STATE COLLEGE OF SCIENCE - ENHANCED LEASE
PAYMENTS. The appropriation in subdivision 8 of section 1 of this Act includes $800,000 for enhanced
lease payments for deferred maintenance and extraordinary repairs for a facility in Fargo. The
enhanced lease payments must be made pursuant to an agreement with the lessor that includes the
repayment of the enhanced lease payments if the property is leased to another party or conveyed prior
to June 30, 2035.
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 6-09-53 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. In consultation with representatives of North Dakota state university and the university of
North Dakota, the Bank, in consultation with the state board of higher education, shall award
grants to institutions under the control of the state board of higher education. The sum of five
million dollars must be awardedThe bank must award ninety percent of the funds available
each biennium to North Dakota state university and the university of North Dakota with equal
amounts awarded to each institution. The remaining funding must be awarded to the other
institutions under the control of the state board of higher education, as determined by the
board. The state board of higher education may not award more than fifty percent of the
available funding during the first year of the biennium. The Bank of North Dakota shall
distribute the grant funding as awarded by the state board of higher education.
SECTION 16. AMENDMENT. Subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 15-10-17 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
a. AppointSubject to section 24 of this Act, appoint and remove the president or other
faculty head, and the professors, instructors, teachers, officers, and other employees of
the several institutions under the board's control, fix the salaries for those positions within
the limits of legislative appropriations; and fix the terms of office and prescribe the duties
of the positions.
SECTION 17. AMENDMENT. Subdivision c of subsection 1 of section 15-10-48 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
c. The board may award up to two million seven hundred thousandthree million two
hundred forty - five thousand dollars in matching grants each to the university of North
Dakota and North Dakota state university; and up to two million two hundred
thousand two million six hundred forty - five thousand dollars in matching grants to the
university of North Dakota school of medicine and health sciences. Of the amount
available to the university of North Dakota, two hundred fifty thousand dollars must be
awarded for projects dedicated to projects at the school of law.
SECTION 18. AMENDMENT. Subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 15-10-48.2 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
a. Subject to legislative appropriations, each biennium the state board of higher education
shall award one dollar in matching grants for every two dollars raised by the institutional
foundation of North Dakota state university for projects dedicated exclusively to

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 9
agricultural research and extension at the agricultural experiment station.
Notwithstanding section 15-10-53, awards under this section may be used for
endowments, academic scholarships, operations, facility repair projects, and new capital
construction projects.
SECTION 19. AMENDMENT. Subdivision c of subsection 1 of section 15-10-48.2 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
c. The board may award up to two million two hundred thousandtwo million six hundred
forty - five thousand dollars in matching grants under this section.
SECTION 20. AMENDMENT. Subdivision c of subsection 1 of section 15-10-49 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
c. The board may award up to:
(1) One million seven hundred thousand Two million forty - five thousand dollars each to
Bismarck state college, Dickinson state university, Minot state university, and the
North Dakota state college of science;
(2) One million one hundred thousandOne million three hundred twenty thousand
dollars each to Dickinson state university, Mayville state university, and Valley City
state university; and
(3) Six hundred thousandSeven hundred twenty thousand dollars each to Dakota
college at Bottineau, Lake Region state college, and Williston state college.
SECTION 21. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 15-10-75 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The state board of higher education may provide award funds to institutions under its control,
excluding the university of North Dakota and North Dakota state university, to create or
enhance educational programs that address the workforce needs of North Dakota business
and industry. An award made under this section may be used for curriculum development,
equipment and technology purchases, facility modifications and equipment installation, hiring
and training new and existing instructors, educational program promotion, and enhancement
of postsecondary partnerships with primary and secondary schools. An institution may not be
awarded more than one million five hundred thousand dollars pursuant to this section during a
biennium. The state board of higher education shall establish a committee, guidelines, and
application process for administration of the grant program established under this section.
SECTION 22. A new section to chapter 15-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Presidential searches.
The state board of higher education is responsible for appointment of presidents at institutions
under the control of the board. Upon notification that the position of an institution president will become
vacant, the state board of higher education may authorize a search committee to conduct a search for a
new president. The state board of higher education may retain the services of a consultant, determined
and selected by the search committee, to assist the search committee.
SECTION 23. A new section to chapter 15-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
State commissioner of higher education - Contract terms - Institution position.
The state board of higher education may enter into a personnel contract with the state
commissioner of higher education. The personnel contract may provide for the commissioner to

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 10
become a faculty or staff member at an institution under the control of the state board of higher
education when the contract term is complete. The salaries and wages of a person who becomes a
faculty or staff member pursuant to this section must be paid from the appropriation to the North Dakota
university system office. The North Dakota university system office may not assess institutions under
the control of the state board of higher education to recover the cost of the salaries and wages paid
pursuant to this section.
SECTION 24. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of the new section to chapter 15-10 of the North Dakota
Century Code, as created by section 1 of House Bill No. 1437, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative
assembly, is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. By July 1, 2026, institutions of higher education under the control of the state board of higher
education offering faculty academic tenure shall develop and adopt a policy for tenured and
tenure-track faculty employed by the institution, which:
a. Defines progression and advancement criteria at each stage of tenure progression,
including criteria for continued post-tenure review.
b. Establishes a procedure for annual evaluation of all nontenure, tenure-track, and tenured
faculty by the president of the institution or the designee of the president.
c. Establishes a procedure for post-tenure evaluations, which must be informed by the
annual evaluations under subdivision b and conducted by a committee appointed by the
president of the institution or the designee of the president. The first post-tenure
evaluation must be completed within three years. Subsequent post-tenure evaluations
must be completed at least every five years or more frequently.
d. Provides the composition of a culminating post-tenure evaluation committee must include
the administrative supervisor of the faculty member being evaluated, at least one ranking
administrator, and tenured faculty comprising no less than one-third and no more than
one-half of the committee.
e. Defines the outcome of an unsatisfactory review of post-tenured faculty, which may be
removal from the position. The decision to remove faculty from a position must be made
by the employing institution and the state board of higher education.
f. Is approved by the state board of higher education.
g. Provides for a hearing and appeal process for a faculty member aggrieved by the policy
adopted under this subsection or decision made by the committee under subdivision c .
SECTION 25. AMENDMENT. Paragraph 3 of subdivision h of subsection 1 of section 15-18.2-02 of
the North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
(3) 9.014.0 for professional level credits;
SECTION 26. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 15-18.2-03 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. If the number of credit-hours completed by an institution would cause a decrease in the credit
completion factor for that institution compared to the credit completion factor the institution
was entitled to receive during the 2017-19received during the prior biennium, the state board
of higher education shall multiply the product determined under section 15-18.2-02 by a credit
growth factor of 1.0 for credits in excess of the factor the institution was entitled to receive
during the 2017-19received during the prior biennium. Any weighted credit-hours multiplied by
a credit growth factor under this section must have a weight of 1.0 under section 15-18.2-02.
The state board of higher education shall multiply the remaining weighted credits by the credit

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 11
completion factor the institution was entitled to receive during the 2017-19received during the
prior biennium.
SECTION 27. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 15-18.2-05 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Except as provided under subsections 2 and 3, to determine the state aid payment to which
each institution under its control is entitled, the state board of higher education shall multiply
the product determined under section 15-18.2-03 by a base amount of:
a. $73.15$79.57 in the case of North Dakota state university and the university of North
Dakota;
b. $103.76$111.55 in the case of Dickinson state university, Mayville state university, Minot
state university, and Valley City state university; and
c. $110.38$119.91 in the case of Bismarck state college, Dakota college at Bottineau, Lake
Region state college, North Dakota state college of science, and Williston state college.
SECTION 28. AMENDMENT. Section 15-54.1-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
15-54.1-04. Tier III capital building funds - Matching requirements.
The state board of higher education may allocate tier III capital building fund moneys to an
institution only after the institution, excluding the university of North Dakota and North Dakota state
university, provides two dollarsone dollar of matching funds from operations or other sources for each
one dollar from the university system capital building fund for the project. The state board of higher
education may allocate tier III capital building fund moneys to the university of North Dakota and North
Dakota state university only after the institution provides two dollars of matching funds from operations
or other sources for each one dollar from the university system capital building fund for the project. An
institution may not use tier I extraordinary repairs funding, tier II capital building fund moneys, or state
funding appropriated for a specific capital project as matching funds under this section.
SECTION 29. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 15-62.5-03 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. If two or more applicants have the same scores as determined in subsection 1, they must be
ranked by the numeric sum of their four scale scores on the ACT or equivalent scores. If a
nationally recognized standardized test approved by the state board of higher education does
not calculate scale scores, the equivalent will be zero.
SECTION 30. AMENDMENT. Section 54-44.1-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
54-44.1-11. Office of management and budget to cancel unexpended appropriations - When
they may continue. (Effective through July 31, 20252027)
Except as otherwise provided by law, the office of management and budget, thirty days after the
close of each biennial period, shall cancel all unexpended appropriations or balances of appropriations
after the expiration of the biennial period during which they became available under the law.
Unexpended appropriations for the state historical society are not subject to this section and the state
historical society shall report on the amounts and uses of funds carried over from one biennium to the
appropriations committees of the next subsequent legislative assembly. Unexpended appropriations for
the North Dakota university system are not subject to this section and the North Dakota university
system shall report on the amounts and uses of funds carried over from one biennium to the next to
subsequent appropriations committees of the legislative assembly. The chairmen of the appropriations
committees of the senate and house of representatives of the legislative assembly with the office of the

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 12
budget may continue appropriations or balances in force for not more than two years after the
expiration of the biennial period during which they became available upon recommendation of the
director of the budget for:
1. New construction projects.
2. Major repair or improvement projects.
3. Purchases of new equipment costing more than ten thousand dollars per unit if it was ordered
during the first twelve months of the biennium in which the funds were appropriated.
4. The purchase of land by the state on a "contract for deed" purchase if the total purchase price
is within the authorized appropriation.
5. Purchases by the department of transportation of roadway maintenance equipment costing
more than ten thousand dollars per unit if the equipment was ordered during the first
twenty-one months of the biennium in which the funds were appropriated.
6. Authorized ongoing information technology projects.
Office of management and budget to cancel unexpended appropriations - When they may
continue. (Effective after July 31, 20252027) The office of management and budget, thirty days after
the close of each biennial period, shall cancel all unexpended appropriations or balances of
appropriations after the expiration of the biennial period during which they became available under the
law. Unexpended appropriations for the state historical society are not subject to this section and the
state historical society shall report on the amounts and uses of funds carried over from one biennium to
the appropriations committees of the next subsequent legislative assembly. The chairmen of the
appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives of the legislative assembly with
the office of the budget may continue appropriations or balances in force for not more than two years
after the expiration of the biennial period during which they became available upon recommendation of
the director of the budget for:
1. New construction projects.
2. Major repair or improvement projects.
3. Purchases of new equipment costing more than ten thousand dollars per unit if it was ordered
during the first twelve months of the biennium in which the funds were appropriated.
4. The purchase of land by the state on a "contract for deed" purchase if the total purchase price
is within the authorized appropriation.
5. Purchases by the department of transportation of roadway maintenance equipment costing
more than ten thousand dollars per unit if the equipment was ordered during the first
twenty-one months of the biennium in which the funds were appropriated.
6. Authorized ongoing information technology projects.
SECTION 31. AMENDMENT. Section 6 of chapter 126 of the 2021 Session Laws is amended and
reenacted as follows:
SECTION 6. TRANSFER - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA - SKILLED WORKFORCE
STUDENT LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM FUND. The Bank of North Dakota shall transfer
the sum of $2,250,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, from the Bank's current
earnings and undivided profits to the skilled workforce student loan repayment fund during the
bienniumperiod beginning July 1, 2021, and ending June 30, 20232027.
SECTION 32. AMENDMENT. Section 7 of chapter 126 of the 2021 Session Laws is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 13
SECTION 7. TRANSFER - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA - SKILLED WORKFORCE
SCHOLARSHIP FUND. The Bank of North Dakota shall transfer the sum of $2,250,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, from the Bank's current earnings and undivided profits
to the skilled workforce scholarship fund during the bienniumperiod beginning July 1, 2021,
and ending June 30, 20232027.
SECTION 33. AMENDMENT. Section 7 of chapter 3 of the 2023 Session Laws is amended and
reenacted as follows:
SECTION 7. TRANSFER - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA PROFITS - STATE BOARD OF
HIGHER EDUCATION SCHOLARSHIPS. The industrial commission shall transfer to the
North Dakota university system a total of $1,500,000 from the current earnings and
accumulated undivided profits of the Bank of North Dakota during the bienniumperiod
beginning July 1, 2023, and ending June 30, 20252027, as requested by the commissioner of
higher education. The estimated income line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 includes
$1,500,000 for the North Dakota university system office for dual-credit tuition scholarships.
SECTION 34. AMENDMENT. Section 8 of chapter 3 of the 2023 Session Laws is amended and
reenacted as follows:
SECTION 8. TRANSFER - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA PROFITS - SKILLED
WORKFORCE STUDENT LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM FUND. The industrial
commission shall transfer the sum of $3,400,000 from the current earnings and accumulated
undivided profits of the Bank of North Dakota to the skilled workforce student loan repayment
program fund during the bienniumperiod beginning July 1, 2023, and ending June 30,
20252027.
SECTION 35. AMENDMENT. Section 9 of chapter 3 of the 2023 Session Laws is amended and
reenacted as follows:
SECTION 9. TRANSFER - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA PROFITS - SKILLED
WORKFORCE SCHOLARSHIP FUND. The industrial commission shall transfer the sum of
$3,400,000 from the current earnings and accumulated undivided profits of the Bank of North
Dakota to the skilled workforce scholarship fund during the bienniumperiod beginning July 1,
2023, and ending June 30, 20252027.
SECTION 36. AMENDMENT. Subsection 17 of section 1 of chapter 550 of the 2021 Special
Session Session Laws is amended and reenacted as follows:
17. There is appropriated from federal funds derived from the state fiscal recovery fund, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $2,104,121, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the university of North Dakota school of medicine and health sciences for
the purpose of purchasing equipment and hiring personnelto be granted to health care
providers in the state to provide hyperbaric oxygen therapy for the period beginning with
the effective date of this Act, and ending June 30, 20232027.
SECTION 37. REPEAL. Section 15-10-74 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
SECTION 38. EXEMPTION - TRANSFER AUTHORITY - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT
REPORT. Notwithstanding section 54-16-04, the office of management and budget shall transfer
appropriation authority from the operations to the capital assets line items within subdivisions 2 through
14 of section 1 of this Act as requested by the state board of higher education, for the period beginning
with the effective date of this Act, and ending June 30, 2027. The board shall report any transfer of
funds under this section to the legislative management.
SECTION 39. EXEMPTION - FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT POSITION ADJUSTMENTS.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the state board of higher education may adjust full-time
equivalent positions as needed, subject to the availability of funds, for institutions and entities under its

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 14
control during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The North Dakota
university system shall report any adjustments to the office of management and budget as part of the
submission of the 2027-29 biennium budget request.
SECTION 40. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The following appropriations are
not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and may be continued into the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027:
1. Any amounts remaining from the $18,160,000 appropriated from the general fund for capital
projects inflation and $411,724,026 appropriated from other funds, including $209,976,971
appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund, for capital projects at
institutions under the control of the state board of higher education in section 1 of chapter 3 of
the 2023 Session Laws;
2. Any amounts remaining from the $8,500,000 appropriated from other funds to Bismarck state
college for the multipurpose academic and athletic center in section 2 of chapter 638 of the
2023 Special Session Session Laws;
3. Any amounts remaining from the $1,500,000 appropriated from Bank of North Dakota profits
for dual-credit scholarships in section 1 of chapter 3 of the 2023 Session Laws;
4. Any amounts remaining from the funding appropriated from federal funds derived from the
state fiscal recovery fund to the state board of higher education and institutions under the
control of the state board of higher education in section 1 of chapter 548 and section 1 of
chapter 550 of the 2021 Special Session Session Laws and continued into the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, and ending June 30, 2025, in section 42 of chapter 3 of the 2023
Session Laws.
SECTION 41. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The following appropriations are
not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and may be continued into the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027:
1. Any amounts remaining from the funding appropriated for the branch research centers capital
projects inflation in subdivision 4 of section 1 of chapter 20 of the 2023 Session Laws,
including related revenues.
2. Any amounts remaining from the funding appropriated for the northern crops institute feed
production center facility upgrade and pellet mill in subdivision 2 of section 1 of chapter 20 of
the 2023 Session Laws, including related revenues.
3. Any amounts remaining from the funding appropriated for the main research center Waldron
hall replacement project in subdivision 4 of section 1 of chapter 20 of the 2023 Session Laws,
including related revenues.
SECTION 42. EXEMPTION - SALE OF PROPERTY AUTHORIZED - USE OF PROCEEDS. The
state of North Dakota, by and through the state board of higher education, may sell and convey certain
real property located at the intersection of sixth avenue north and forty-second street north, in the
southeast corner, unplatted parts including the north half of the northwest quarter of the southwest
quarter of section 5, township 151 north, range 50, estimated to include 20 acres, in the records of the
city of Grand Forks. If any real property authorized to be conveyed under this section is conveyed, the
terms of conveyance must be determined jointly by the state board of higher education or a designee of
the board and the commissioner of university and school lands. Sections 54-01-05.2 and 54-01-05.5 do
not apply to the transfers authorized by this section. Any proceeds from the sale of land pursuant to this
section may be used only for deferred maintenance and extraordinary repairs.
SECTION 43. EXEMPTION - SALE OF PROPERTY AUTHORIZED - USE OF PROCEEDS. The
state of North Dakota, by and through the state board of higher education, may sell and convey certain
real property located at the intersection of Demers avenue and forty-second street north, in the

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 15
northwest corner, known as 4201 James Ray drive, the south east corner of lot 1, block 1, estimated to
be 2.74 acres, in the records of the city of Grand Forks. If any real property authorized to be conveyed
under this section is conveyed, the terms of conveyance must be determined jointly by the state board
of higher education or a designee of the board and the commissioner of university and school lands.
Sections 54-01-05.2 and 54-01-05.5 do not apply to the transfers authorized by this section. Any
proceeds from the sale of land pursuant to this section may be used only for deferred maintenance and
extraordinary repairs.
SECTION 44. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA SCHOOL OF MEDICINE AND HEALTH
SCIENCES - UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT PROGRAM - STUDENT
RESIDENCY - REPORT. The university of North Dakota shall develop and implement student
recruitment and acceptance strategies to increase the number of resident medical students enrolled in
the school of medicine and health sciences and to increase the number of resident students enrolled in
the physician assistant program, with a goal for eighty-five percent of medical students enrolled at the
school of medicine and health sciences and in the physician assistant program to be residents of the
state by the fall 2030 semester. The university of North Dakota shall provide an annual report to the
legislative management regarding strategies under consideration and implemented to increase resident
medical student enrollment in the school of medicine and health sciences and in the physician assistant
program, during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 45. HIGHER EDUCATION FUNDING REVIEW COMMITTEE - REPORT TO THE
LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the higher education funding review committee is created and
composed of thirteen members as follows:
a. Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the majority leader of the
house of representatives and one member appointed by the minority leader of the house
of representatives;
b. Two members of the senate appointed by the majority leader of the senate and one
member appointed by the minority leader of the senate;
c. One member of the legislative assembly appointed by the legislative management to
serve as the committee chairman;
d. Six nonvoting members, including:
(1) The university of North Dakota vice president for finance and operations, or a
designee of the vice president for finance and operations;
(2) The North Dakota state university vice president for finance and administration, or a
designee of the vice president for finance and administration;
(3) Two representatives from regional four-year universities, including dual-mission
institutions, appointed by the state board of higher education; and
(4) Two representatives from two-year colleges, including polytechnic institutions,
appointed by the state board of higher education.
2. The committee shall review funding methods for higher education in the state, including the
higher education funding formula, the university system capital building fund, permanent funds
distributions, property tax allocations, oil and gas gross production and oil extraction tax
revenue allocations, other statutory funds for higher education and research, and other
funding appropriated to institutions and entities under the control of the state board of higher
education.
3. The committee must receive and consider input from representatives of all higher education
institutions under the control of the state board of higher education.

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 16
4. The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislative management
by September 1, 2026.
SECTION 46. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - DUAL-CREDIT. During the 2025-26
interim, the legislative management shall study dual-credit in the state, including which institutions may
offer dual-credit courses, where dual-credit courses may be provided by the institutions, and state
funding provided for dual-credit. The legislative management shall report its findings and
recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the
seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 47. PRAXIS CORE TESTING PERFORMANCE - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT
REPORT. The legislative management shall request a report during the 2025-26 interim from the
association of colleges for teacher education regarding a study of the praxis core testing performance
of student teachers who used grades and exams to demonstrate reading, writing, and mathematics
competencies.
SECTION 48. STATE BOARD OF HIGHER EDUCATION STUDY AND REPORT -
COMMISSIONER OF HIGHER EDUCATION - LEGISLATIVE INTENT - REPORT.
1. The state board of higher education shall study the costs and benefits of a system of higher
education led by a chancellor compared to a commissioner during the 2025-26 interim. The
state board of higher education shall report its findings and recommendations, including any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the legislative management by
May 31, 2026.
2. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that:
a. The state board of higher education appoint a state commissioner of higher education in
compliance with chapter 15-10 of the North Dakota Century Code and subsection 7 of
section 6 of article VIII of the Constitution of North Dakota.
b. The state commissioner of higher education be recognized as a position important to the
efficient and effective functioning of the North Dakota university system.
c. The state board of higher education recognize the importance of hiring an individual for
the position of state commissioner of higher education in an efficient and timely manner.
3. The state board of higher education shall provide a report to the legislative management by
October 15, 2025, regarding the hiring process for the state commissioner of higher education
position, including detail regarding the cause or reasoning behind any delays in the hiring
process.
SECTION 49. LEGISLATIVE INTENT - WEIGHTED CREDIT-HOURS - INSTRUCTIONAL
PROGRAM CLASSIFICATION FACTORS. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that
wind energy technology and law enforcement courses be transferred to the career and technical
education instructional program classification within the higher education funding formula.
SECTION 50. LEGISLATIVE INTENT - UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA SCHOOL OF
MEDICINE AND HEALTH SCIENCES - ALLIED HEALTH FACILITY. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly that an allied health facility expansion be completed at the university of North
Dakota school of medicine and health sciences.
SECTION 51. LEGISLATIVE INTENT - SEPARATION AGREEMENTS. It is the intent of the
sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the state board of higher education not enter into any separation or
early retirement agreements, other than approved agreements consistent with the individual's personnel
contract and state law, with a cost to the state or the institutions under the control of the state board of
higher education during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 17
SECTION 52. EMERGENCY. The workforce education innovation grants and capital assets line
items in section 1 and sections 4, 5, 6, 10, 11, 13, 14, 21, 38, 42, and 43 of this Act are declared to be
an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2003 - PAGE 18
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2003 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 42 Nays 2 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 69 Nays 18 Absent 7
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State